Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 13 Deferred Compensation Plans

36-13-1.
Deferred compensation plans authorized.

The state or any city, town, or other political subdivision may, by contract, agree with any employee to defer, in whole or in part, any portion of that employee’s compensation, and may subsequently contract with financial institutions for the purchase of government securities or with other financial entities for the purchase of mutual funds, and procure a fixed or variable life insurance or annuity contract for the purpose of providing funds to meet its obligations under a deferred compensation program for the employees from any financial institutions or from any life underwriters duly licensed by this state who represents an insurance company licensed to contract business in this state.

In the administration of a deferred compensation plan for state employees authorized under this chapter, after October 1, 1998, the state shall engage three companies (“Authorized Companies”) to administer such deferred compensation plans. After October 1, 1998, only such Authorized Companies shall be entitled to enroll state employees in such deferred compensation plans in accordance with the following guidelines:

Employees must have the option of purchasing or investing in alternative financial products referred to herein which have been approved by the State Investment Commission;

The alternative financial products shall include, without limitation, a variable product and a fixed product;

The Authorized Companies (or an entity related thereto) must:

Be selected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter,

Covenant that all employees covered under any plan authorized under this chapter shall, at all times, be granted the unfettered right to cancel, change, liquidate, amend or interchange any investment contract or product purchased in any such plan without such employees incurring a financial penalty or fee of any kind or nature imposed by contract, and

Be granted equal access to all eligible employees;

Procedures shall be established to ensure that personalized information regarding employees shall not be provided to third parties by the Authorized Companies. “Personalized Information” shall include, without limitation, social security numbers, home addresses, telephone numbers, amounts invested, medical or disability information; and

The Authorized Companies shall be permitted to offer any financial product referred to herein which shall have been approved by the State Investment Commission. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section (b), if the department of administration determines that less than three companies are qualified to be engaged as Authorized Companies because of (a) insufficient experience in the administration of deferred compensation plans or (b) a failure to assure adherence to the guidelines set forth herein, the state may engage less than three Authorized Companies.

If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 33.

36-13-1.1.
State investment commission.

The state investment commission shall, from time to time, select the financial institutions and/or entities in which the state shall invest the funds under the deferred compensation plan for state employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 182, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 225, § 2.

36-13-2.
Entering into agreements.

The chief administrative officer of any city or town or director of administration of the state of Rhode Island is hereby authorized to enter into contractual agreements with employees of that particular state agency, department, board, commission, or institution on behalf of the state to defer any portion of that employee’s compensation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1.

36-13-3.
Administration of program.

The administration of the deferred compensation program within each state agency, department, board, commission, or institution shall be under the direction of the director or principal officer of that particular agency, department, board, commission, or institution. Each city, town, or other political subdivision shall designate an officer to administer the deferred compensation program. Reductions in payroll shall be made, in each instance, by the appropriate payroll officer. The administrator of the deferred compensation program may contract with a private corporation or institution for providing consolidated billing and other administrative services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1.

36-13-4.
“Employee” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, “employee” means any person, whether appointed, elected or under contract, providing services for the state, county, city, town, or other political subdivision, for which compensation is paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1.

36-13-5.
Annuity and insurance contracts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, those persons designated to administer the deferred compensation program are hereby authorized to make payments for the purchase of government securities, mutual funds, fixed or variable life insurance, or annuity contracts under the deferred compensation program. The payments shall not be construed to be a prohibited use of the general assets of the state, county, city, or other political subdivision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 225, § 1.

36-13-6.
Other benefits unaffected.

The deferred compensation program established by this chapter shall exist and serve in addition to retirement, pension, or benefit systems established by the state, county, city, town, or other political subdivision, and no deferral of income under the deferred compensation program shall affect a reduction of any retirement, pension, or other benefit provided by law. However, any sum deferred under the deferred compensation program shall not be subject to taxation until distribution is actually made to the employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1.

36-13-7.
Financial liability limitations.

The financial liability of the state, city, town, or other political subdivision under a deferred compensation program shall be limited in each instance to the value of the particular fixed or variable life insurance or annuity contract or contracts purchased on behalf of any employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 34, § 1.

36-13-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 182, § 2.